District of Columbia statutes.
9-206.01

Validity of condemnations or closings pursuant to repealed law not affected.

The validity of any condemnation proceeding or any street or alley closing pursuant to any section of law repealed by this act shall not be affected by its repeal.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 601, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., § 7-471.
“This act,” referred to in this section, is D.C. Law 4-201.